Nevada, session 83, SB489.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Northern
Nevada Transitional Housing budget account for the purchase of
small equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $1,660
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $1,660
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred,
and must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Northern Nevada
Transitional Housing budget account the sum of $8,228 for the
replacement of maintenance equipment.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Casa Grande
Transitional Housing budget account the sum of $12,312 for the
replacement of sunshade canopies and office chairs.
Sec. 4. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by
sections 2 and 3 of this act must not be committed for expenditure
after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made
or any entity to which money from the appropriation is granted or
otherwise transferred in any manner, and any portion of the
appropriated money remaining must not be spent for any purpose
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money
was appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)